Utah statutes.
48-2c-1505.   Name limitations.
(1)  The name of a domestic professional services company and of a foreign
professional services company authorized to transact business in this state,
in addition to satisfying the requirements of Sections 48-2c-106, 48-2c-1602,
and 48-2c-1606:
(a)  may not contain language stating or implying that it is formed for a
purpose other than that authorized by its articles of organization or by
Section 48-2c-1503;
(b)  must conform with any rule promulgated by the regulating board having
jurisdiction over a professional service described in the company's articles
of organization; and
(c)  must contain, in its articles of organization and in all reports and
documents filed with the division, the words "professional limited liability
company" or the abbreviations "P.L.L.C." or "PLLC" in lieu of the requirements
of Subsection 48-2c-106(1)(a).
(2)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (1)(c), a professional
services company may hold itself out to the public under a name that does not
contain the words "professional limited liability company" or the
abbreviations "P.L.L.C." or "PLLC" so long as that name meets the requirements
of Subsection 48-2c-106(1)(a).
(3)  Sections 48-2c-106, 48-2c-1607, and 48-2c-1608 do not prevent the use of
a name otherwise prohibited by those sections if it is the personal name of an
individual member or individual former member of the professional services
company or the name of an individual who was associated with a predecessor of
the professional services company.
